Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.160

Construction—1967 ex.s. c 119.

This title is intended to implement and preserve to code cities all powers authorized by Article XI, section 11 of the Constitution of the state of Washington and the provision of this title shall not limit any code city from exercising its constitutionally granted power to plan for and to make and enforce within its limits all such local police, sanitary, and other regulations in the manner that its charter or ordinances may provide.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.160.]